vi: Phần cứng > Đường ống > Bộ phận và phần cứng của thiết bị đường ống > Phụ kiện vòi hoa sen: Thiết bị điều tiết nước bồn tắm và vòi sen; Vòi hoa sen điện; Tay sen và đầu nối; Bệ tắm; Vòi sen cây; Cửa & Vách phòng tắm; Bát sen; Tường phòng tắm; Bộ lọc nước cho vòi hoa sen
da: Isenkram > Sanitet > Dele til sanitære installationer > Brusebad – tilbehør: Massagebrusere; Elektriske brusere; Bruserarme og koblingsled; Brusekar; Brusesøjler; Brusedøre og -kabiner; Brusehoveder; Brusenicher og -kabiner; Vandfiltre til bruser
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Vodovod > Strojna oprema in deli za vodovodne napeljave > Deli za prho: Masažne šobe za kopalno kad in prho; Električne prhe in visokotlačne prhe; Ročke in priključki za prho; Podstavki za prhanje; Stebri za prho; Vrata in kabine za prhe; Glave za prhanje; Stene in obloge za prho; Vodni filtri za prho
hr-HR: Željezarija > Vodoinstalaterska oprema > Oprema i dijelovi za vodoinstalatersku opremu > Dijelovi tuša: Mlaznice za kadu i tuš; Električni tuševi i tuševi s pumpom za povećenje tlaka vode; Ručice i priključci za tuš; Postolja za tuš; Šipke za tuševe; Tuš vrata i pregrade; Glave tuša; Stijene tuševa i zaštite za zid; Filtri za vodu za tuševe
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 管道 > 水管装置和部件 > 淋浴部件: 浴缸/淋浴喷水系统; 电热淋浴器; 花洒臂与连接器; 淋浴房底座; 淋浴柱; 淋浴门/淋浴间; 花洒; 淋浴隔断/围帘; 淋浴滤水器
bg-BG: Железария > Водоснабдяване и канализация > Аксесоари и части за ВиК оборудване > Части за душ: Дюзи за вана и душ; Електрически и мощни душове; Душ рамена и фитинги; Душ корита; Душ колони; Душ врати и кабини; Душ глави; Душ стени и облицовки; Водни филтри за душ
fi: Rakentaminen > Putkityöt > Putkien kiinnitys ja osat > Suihkuosat: Kylpyammehanat ja suihkut; Sähkösuihkut; Suihkuvarret ja liittimet; Suihkualtaat; Pylväsmäiset suihkut; Suihkuovet ja -seinät; Suihkupäät; Suihkuseinät ja -kopit; Suihkuvesisuodattimet
ja: DIY用品 > 水道設備 > 配管固定具・パーツ > シャワー関連パーツ: 浴槽・シャワー用ジェット噴射装置; 電気式シャワー; シャワーアーム・コネクター; シャワールーム用床材; シャワーパネル; シャワールーム用ドア; シャワーヘッド; シャワールーム用壁材・周辺設備; シャワー用浄水器
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Vodoinstalace > Instalatérské potřeby a součástky > Sprchové armatury: Trysky pro sprchy a vany; Sprchy s ohřevem nebo čerpadlem; Sprchové držáky a rozdvojky; Sprchové vany; Sprchové panely; Sprchové dveře; Sprchové hlavice; Sprchové stěny; Sprchové filtry
ko: 철물 > 배관 > 배관 시설 장비/부품 > 샤워실 부품: 욕조/샤워기 분사 장치; 전기 샤워기/동력 샤워기; 샤워대/연결부; 샤워실 바닥; 샤워 기둥; 샤워실 문/샤워 부스; 샤워기 헤드; 샤워실 벽/서라운드; 샤워기 필터
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Prodotti idraulici > Ferramenta per la riparazione di impianti idraulici > Componenti doccia: Getti per vasca da bagno e doccia; Docce elettriche; Connettori e bracci doccia; Piatti doccia; Pannelli doccia; Porte doccia; Soffioni doccia; Pareti e ambienti doccia; Filtri acqua doccia
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Υδραυλικές εγκαταστάσεις > Εξαρτήματα & ανταλλακτικά υδραυλικών ειδών > Ανταλλακτικά ντους: Κεφαλές δέσμης νερού μπανιέρας και ντους; Ηλεκτρικοί καταιονητήρες (ντους); Βραχίονες & συνδέσεις ντους; Βάσεις ντους; Κολόνες ντους; Πόρτες & περικαλύμματα καταιονητήρα (ντους); Κεφαλές ντους; Τοίχοι & περιβλήματα ντους; Φίλτρα νερού ντους
en: Hardware > Plumbing > Plumbing Fixture Hardware & Parts > Shower Parts: Bathtub & Shower Jets; Electric & Power Showers; Shower Arms & Connectors; Shower Bases; Shower Columns; Shower Doors & Enclosures; Shower Heads; Shower Walls & Surrounds; Shower Water Filters
tr: Hırdavat > Sıhhi tesisat > Su Tahliye Teçhizatı ve Parçaları > Duş Parçaları: Küvet ve Duş Su Püskürtücüleri; Elektrikli Isıtıcılı ve Pompalı Duşlar; Duş Başlığı Kolları ve Bağlantı Parçaları; Duş Tekneleri; Duş Panelleri; Duş Kapıları ve Duşakabinler; Duş Başlıkları; Duşakabin Duvar ve Çevirmeleri; Duşakabin Su Arıtıcıları
pt-BR: Ferragens > Encanamento > Peças e ferragens para fixação de encanamento > Peças para chuveiro: Jatos de banheira e chuveiro; Chuveiros elétricos e pressurizados; Conectores e braços para chuveiros; Bases para chuveiros; Painéis para chuveiros; Portas para chuveiros; Cabeças de chuveiro; Cabines de chuveiro; Filtros de água para chuveiro
es: Bricolaje > Fontanería > Piezas y herramientas para componentes de fontanería > Artículos de ducha: Boquillas de chorro para bañeras y duchas; Duchas eléctricas y a presión; Adaptadores y brazos de ducha; Platos de ducha; Paneles de ducha; Puertas de ducha; Cabezales de ducha; Paredes y mamparas de ducha; Filtros de agua para ducha
pt-PT: Equipamento > Canalização > Peças e equipamento de fixação de canalização > Peças de duche: Chuveiros de duche e banheira; Chuveiros de alta pressão e elétricos; Conectores e braços de duche; Bases de duche; Colunas de duche; Portas e estruturas de duche; Cabeças de chuveiro; Paredes e revestimentos de duche; Filtros de água de duche
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы водоснабжения и водоотведения > Комплектующие и детали для сантехнического оборудования > Детали для душа: Форсунки для ванны и душа; Души с электроподогревом и повышением напора воды; Держатели и выводы для душа; Поддоны для душа; Стойки для душа; Двери для душа; Лейки для душа; Перегородки и стеновые панели для душа; Фильтры для душа
zh-TW: 硬體 > 管線 > 衛生器具和零件 > 衛浴零件: 淋浴/沐浴用按摩噴頭; 溫度控制/水壓控制淋浴器; 沐浴彎管; 淋浴底座; 淋浴柱; 淋浴門/淋浴間; 蓮蓬頭; 淋浴隔牆; 淋浴濾水器
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Loodgieterswerk > Onderdelen voor sanitair > Doucheonderdelen: Bad- en douchejets; Elektrische en krachtdouches; Douchekoppen en montagemateriaal; Douchevloeren; Douchepanelen; Douchedeuren; Douchekoppen; Douchewanden en -muren; Waterfilters voor douche
fr: Quincaillerie > Plomberie > Pièces et matériel de plomberie > Pièces de douches: Jets pour baignoires et douches; Chauffe-eau électriques instantanés et jets haute pression; Bras et embouts de douche; Bacs de douche; Colonnes de douche; Portes et parois de douche; Pommes de douche; Panneaux de douche; Filtres de douche
sk-SK: Náradie > Vodoinštalačné práce > Príslušenstvo a diely pre vodovodné armatúry > Sprchové diely: Vaňové a sprchové trysky; Elektrické sprchové systémy; Ramená a konektory na sprchovú hlavicu; Sprchové vaničky; Sprchové stĺpy; Sprchové dvere a zásteny; Sprchové hlavice; Sprchové zásteny a kúty; Sprchové vodné filtre
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Sanitär > Zubehör für sanitäre Anlagen > Duscharmaturen: Badewannen- & Duschdüsen; Elektrische & Powerduschen; Duscharme & Verbindungsteile; Duschwannen; Duschpaneele; Duschkabinen & -türen; Duschköpfe; Duschwände; Wasserfilter für Duschen
sv: Metallprodukter > Rörmokeri > Vattenkransutrustning och -delar > Duschtillbehör: Jetstrålar till badkar och duschar; Elektriska duschar och powerduschar; Duscharmar och -anslutningsrör; Duschsocklar; Takduschmunstycken; Duschdörrar och nischer; Duschstrilar; Duschväggar och omgivningar; Duschvattenfilter
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ระบบท่อประปา > ฮาร์ดแวร์และชิ้นส่วนสำหรับงานท่อ > ชิ้นส่วนฝักบัว: หัวฉีดของอ่างอาบน้ำและฝักบัว; เครื่องทำน้ำอุ่นและเครื่องปรับแรงดันน้ำ; ก้านและตัวเชื่อมต่อฝักบัว; พื้นรองอาบน้ำ; แผงควบคุมฝักบัว; ประตูและที่กั้นสำหรับอาบน้ำ; หัวของฝักบัว; ผนังบังสำหรับที่อาบน้ำ; ตัวกรองน้ำฝักบัว
hu: Hardver > Vízvezeték > Vízvezeték-szerelvény-hardver és -alkatrészek > Zuhanyalkatrészek: Fürdőkád és zuhanyfúvókák; Elektromos és erős zuhanyok; Zuhanykarok és -csatlakozók; Zuhanylapok; Zuhanyoszlopok; Zuhanyajtók és kabinok; Zuhanyfejek; Zuhanyfalak és -környékek; Zuhanyvízszűrők
pl: Sprzęt > Systemy hydrauliczne > Armatura wodociągowa i części > Części do prysznica: Dysze do wanien i pryszniców; Baterie prysznicowe elektryczne i wysokociśnieniowe; Wylewki i złączki do pryszniców; Brodziki; Baterie prysznicowe; Drzwi i kabiny prysznicowe; Głowice prysznicowe; Ścianki prysznicowe; Filtry do wody do prysznica
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Santechnika > Santechnikos įranga ir dalys > Dušo dalys: Vonios ir dušo purkštukai; Elektriniai ir siurbliniai dušai; Dušo galvučių laikikliai ir jungtys; Dušo kabinų pagrindai; Dušo stovai; Dušo durys ir kabinos; Dušo galvutės; Dušo sienelės ir aplinka; Dušo vandens filtrai
nb: Maskinvare > Rørlegging > Utstyr og deler for rørmontering > Dusjdeler: Dyser for badekar og dusj; Elektriske dusjer og pumpedusjer; Dusjarmer og -tilkoblinger; Dusjbaser; Dusjstolper; Dusjdører og -kabinetter; Dusjhoder; Dusjvegger og -vegger; Vannfiltre for dusj
ro-RO: Feronerie > Instalații sanitare > Accesorii de feronerie și piese pentru instalații sanitare > Piese pentru dușuri: Jeturi pentru cadă și duș; Dușuri electrice și cu presiune; Brațe și conectori pentru duș; Baze de duș; Coloane de duș; Uși și cabine de duș; Capete de duș; Pereți și împrejmuiri pentru duș; Filtre de apă pentru duș